Maryland, session 2025, HB0583.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–1402.
(a) (1) (I) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection and
subject to the approval of the Department, a county board [may] SHALL establish one
virtual school for the elementary, middle, and high school grade bands.
(II) A COUNTY BOARD THAT DETERMINES THAT IT IS UNABLE TO
OFFER A VIRTUAL SCHOOL TO STUDENTS IN THE COUNTY ON ITS OWN IS
ENCOURAGED TO COLLABORATE WITH ONE OR MORE OTHER COUNTY BOARDS TO
JOINTLY ESTABLISH A VIRTUAL SCHOOL.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0583*

HOUSE BILL 583
(2) The Department may provide preliminary authorization to a county
board to establish one additional virtual school on a showing of just cause, as determined
by the Department.
(3) The Department may revoke approval of a virtual school if during the
previous school year the virtual school fails to meet the standards established by the
Department in regulation.
(4) (i) A county board may appeal a denial or revocation of approval for
the establishment of a virtual school to the State Board for adjudication during a public
hearing.
(ii) The State Board shall develop an appeals process to carry out the
provisions of this paragraph.
7–1403.
(a) A student who is eligible for enrollment in a public school in the State is
eligible to enroll in a virtual school.
(b) (1) THE CRITERIA ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT OR A COUNTY
BOARD FOR ENROLLMENT IN A VIRTUAL SCHOOL SHALL BE REASONABLE AND MAY
NOT UNDULY INTERFERE WITH AN APPLICANT’S ABILITY TO ENROLL IN A VIRTUAL
SCHOOL.
(2) In addition to the criteria established by the Department or a county
board, an application for enrollment in a virtual school shall require an applicant to
describe why instruction in a virtual learning environment will lead to successful academic
outcomes for the applicant.
(c) (1) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, not more than
10% of the students who would otherwise attend a single public school in the county in any
school year may enroll in a virtual school established by a county board.
(ii) A sudden decrease in enrollment in a single public school that
results in 10% or more of the students who would otherwise attend that public school
attending a virtual school established by a county board is not a violation of this paragraph.
(2) The Department may authorize a county board to exceed the cap under
paragraph (1) of this subsection on a showing of just cause.
(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, if a county board
receives more applications than there are available spaces in a virtual school, the county
board shall admit all students on a lottery basis.
(2) A county board shall give greater weight to a student’s lottery status as
a part of a lottery held under paragraph (1) of this subsection based on demographic

HOUSE BILL 583 3
diversity under subsection (e) of this section and any other criteria established by the
county board.
(e) To the extent practicable, the student body of a virtual school shall reflect the
socioeconomic, racial, ethnic, cultural, and gender diversity of the students enrolled in the
public school system in the county.
(f) (1) The county board shall develop an EQUITABLE outreach campaign to
provide information to the public on the availability of the virtual school option.
(2) The EQUITABLE outreach campaign shall be designed to encourage
applications from students who meet the intent of subsection (e) of this section, including
the production of materials and communications in languages spoken by more than the
percentage of the student population in the local school system determined appropriate by
the county board.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.